North Carolina, session 2025, HB947.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. DYSLEXIA SCREENINGS AND INTERVENTIONS
SECTION 1.(a) Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 9D.
"Students with Dyslexia.
"§ 115C-150.20. Purpose.
It is the intent of the General Assembly that all students with dyslexia receive the necessary
and appropriate screenings, assessments, and special education services providing interventions
for learning difficulties with language, reading, and writing. To provide a common set of
professional standards and guidelines for the identification of and intervention for students with
dyslexia, the State Board of Education and local boards of education shall implement a screening
process, comprehensive assessment, and intervention strategies for these students in accordance
with the provisions of this Article and Article 9 of this Chapter.
"§ 115C-150.21. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) Disability. – As defined in G.S. 115C-106.3(2).
(2) Dyslexia. – A disorder in one or more of the basic psychological processes
involved in the understanding or in using language, spoken or written,
characterized by difficulty with accurate or fluent word recognition, or both,
and by difficulty with spelling and decoding.
(3) Individualized education program or IEP. – As defined in
G.S. 115C-106.3(6).
(4) Science of Reading. – As defined in G.S. 115C-83.3(7a).
(5) Special education. – As defined in G.S. 115C-106.3(20).
"§ 115C-150.22. Screening, assessment, and intervention.
(a) The State Board of Education shall provide informational materials and screening
instruments developed in accordance with G.S. 115C-12(50) to local boards of education to
*H947-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
identify students who exhibit potential indicators of dyslexia. Each local board of education shall
provide informational materials related to dyslexia to parents of students who exhibit potential
indicators of dyslexia on an annual basis.
(b) Local school administrative units shall screen every student in grades kindergarten
through three, grade six, and grade nine for dyslexia using the screening instrument adopted by
the State Board.
(c) If a screening instrument indicates that a student exhibits potential indicators of
dyslexia, the local school administrative unit shall administer a comprehensive assessment
adopted by the State Board to determine whether the student has dyslexia. A student identified
as having dyslexia shall be provided appropriate intervention strategies grounded in the Science
of Reading through the student's individualized education program in accordance with the rules
adopted by the State Board.
"§ 115C-150.23. Training for school personnel.
(a) All grades kindergarten through three, grade six, and grade nine teachers shall be
trained to administer the screening instruments provided by the State Board pursuant to
G.S. 115C-150.22.
(b) Ongoing professional development opportunities shall be made available to teachers
and other school personnel on the identification of and intervention strategies for students with
dyslexia."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 115C-12 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(50) Informational Materials and Screening for Dyslexia. – The State Board of
Education shall develop informational materials to be shared with parents
regarding dyslexia. The State Board of Education shall adopt age-appropriate
screening instruments, a comprehensive assessment for students who exhibit
potential indicators for dyslexia, and appropriate intervention strategies
grounded in the Science of Reading for use by local boards of education."
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 115C-83.10(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Each local board of education shall report annually in writing to the State Board of
Education by September 1 of each year the following information on the prior school year:
(1) A description of all literacy interventions provided to students who have been
retained under G.S. 115C-83.7(a).
(1a) A description of the literacy interventions provided to (i) students who exhibit
potential indicators of dyslexia and (ii) students with dyslexia.
(2) The number of first and second grade students attending a reading camp
offered by the local board.
(3) The license area or areas, years of licensed teaching experience, grade level
assignment, and any other specific subject-area assignments of each teacher
providing instruction at a reading camp.
(4) The number and percentage of teachers providing instruction at a reading
camp who were paid a reading performance bonus during the school year
immediately preceding the reading camp and the grade level on which the
bonus was based.
(5) The number of kindergarten through third grade students with an Individual
Reading Plan."
SECTION 1.(d) G.S. 115C-83.6A(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Each local school administrative unit shall submit to the Department of Public
Instruction a plan for the literacy interventions it will offer, including reading camps, in the
following school year no later than October 1. The plan shall include information about the
specific literacy interventions and literacy curricula that will be used with (i) students who exhibit
potential indicators of dyslexia and (ii) students with dyslexia. The plan shall include information
about the local school administrative unit's efforts to staff reading camps with the most qualified
Page 2 House Bill 947-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
teachers possible, including the unit's efforts to attract teachers associated with high growth in
reading based on EVAAS data and teachers who have earned a reading bonus. The plan shall
incorporate any feedback received from the Department on the previous year's plan. As part of
their plans, local school administrative units are encouraged to partner with other local school
administrative units and with community organizations to enhance literacy interventions."
SECTION 1.(e) G.S. 115C-83.6B(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) An Individual Reading Plan (IRP) shall be developed for any student in kindergarten
through third grade demonstrating difficulty with reading development based on the results of
either (i) the first diagnostic or formative assessment of the school year or (ii) the first diagnostic
or formative assessment of the second semester of the school year. The IRP shall be continually
adjusted based on multiple data sources as prescribed by the Department of Public Instruction,
including the results of any dyslexia screening performed in accordance with G.S. 115C-150.22,
indicating that the student is not progressing toward grade-level standards in one or more major
reading areas. Based on the most recently collected data, the IRP shall include the following
information, specific to the identified student:
(1) The specific reading skill deficiencies identified by assessment data.
(2) Goals and benchmarks for growth.
(3) The means by which progress will be monitored and evaluated.
(4) The specific additional literacy interventions the student will receive.
(5) The Science of Reading-based instructional programming the teacher will
implement.
(6) Any additional services the teacher deems appropriate to accelerate the
student's reading skill and development."
SECTION 1.(f) Each local board of education shall report to the State Board of
Education on the following information by September 15, 2026:
(1) A description of the literacy interventions provided to students who exhibit
potential indicators of dyslexia, which includes difficulty with accurate or
fluent word recognition, or both, and difficulty with spelling and decoding.
(2) A description of the literacy interventions provided to students with dyslexia.
(3) A list and description of any literacy curricula being used with students with
dyslexia.
(4) A list and description of the professional development offered to teachers in
the local school administrative unit that includes instruction on identifying and
providing interventions for students with dyslexia. This shall include the
number of teachers who have participated in the professional development.
The State Board of Education shall report the information provided by the local
boards of education, with an executive summary and disaggregated by local school
administrative units, to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee by November 15,
2026.
SECTION 1.(g) This section is effective when it becomes law. Subsections (a), (b),
and (e) of this section apply beginning with the 2026-2027 school year. Subsection (c) of this
section applies beginning with the report submitted by September 1, 2027. Subsection (d) of this
section applies beginning with literacy intervention plans submitted by October 1, 2026.

PART II. EARLY LITERACY PROGRAM
SECTION 2. G.S. 115C-83.4B(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) As part of the Early Literacy Program, the Department of Public Instruction shall
focus on at least the following components:
(1) Provide a training program to educators and administrators working with
children in the NC Pre-K program to ensure developmentally appropriate
instruction grounded in the Science of Reading and outcomes promoting
House Bill 947-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
reading achievement in students. The Department of Public Instruction shall
utilize a third-party independent teacher training program to deliver
professional development that demonstrates evidence-based success with
educators and administrators in establishing deep knowledge of literacy
instruction.
(2) Provide integration of age-appropriate resources, including digital and
technological resources, in the NC Pre-K program for children to meet reading
achievement goals.
(3) Ensure administration of a formative assessment to children at the conclusion
of their participation in the NC Pre-K program to determine their kindergarten
readiness and the alignment of their literacy instruction with the Science of
Reading. The Department shall also ensure that the results of each child's
formative assessment are shared with the child's kindergarten teacher at the
beginning of the next school year.
(4) Ensure administration of a dyslexia screening instrument to every student
participating in the NC Pre-K program. The Department shall ensure that the
results of each child's screening are shared with the child's kindergarten
teacher at the beginning of the next school year.
(5) Provide training to educators and administrators working with children in the
NC Pre-K program to ensure appropriate instruction and intervention
strategies are used with students who exhibit potential indicators of dyslexia."

PART III. EDUCATOR PREPARATION AND CONTINUING LICENSURE
SECTION 3.(a) G.S. 115C-269.20(a)(3) reads as rewritten:
"(3) EPPs providing training for elementary and special education general
curriculum teachers shall ensure that students receive instruction in early
literacy intervention strategies and practices that are aligned with the Science
of Reading and State and national reading standards and shall include the
following:
a. Instruction in the teaching of reading, including a substantive
understanding of reading as a process involving oral language,
phonological and phonemic awareness, phonics, fluency, vocabulary,
and comprehension. Instruction shall include appropriate application
of literacy interventions to ensure reading proficiency for all students.
b. Instruction in evidence-based assessment and diagnosis of specific
areas of difficulty with reading development and of reading
deficiencies.
c. Instruction in appropriate application of literacy interventions to
ensure reading proficiency for all students.
d. Instruction in the identification of and intervention strategies for
students with dyslexia."
SECTION 3.(b) G.S. 115C-269.20(a)(4) reads as rewritten:
"(4) EPPs providing training for middle and high school teachers shall include the
following:
a. Adequate coursework in the relevant content area. For clinical
residency programs, students may instead demonstrate mastery of the
relevant content area through the passage of the relevant content area
examination approved by the State Board.
b. Adequate coursework in the teaching of the relevant content area.
c. For EPPs providing training for science teachers, adequate preparation
in issues related to science laboratory safety.
Page 4 House Bill 947-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
d. Instruction in the identification of and intervention strategies for
students with dyslexia."
SECTION 3.(c) G.S. 115C-270.30(b)(2) reads as rewritten:
"(2) For elementary school teachers, teachers and middle school teachers teaching
under a Middle Grades license, at least three continuing education credits
related to literacy. Literacy renewal credits shall include evidence-based
assessment, diagnosis, and intervention strategies for students not
demonstrating reading proficiency, grounded in the Science of Reading, as
defined in G.S. 115C-83.3. At least one credit shall include instruction in the
identification of and intervention strategies for students with dyslexia."

PART IV. MIDDLE SCHOOL LITERACY INSTRUCTION
SECTION 4. Article 8 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 115C-81.37. Literacy instruction in middle schools.
To the extent literacy instruction is provided, all literacy instruction in middle schools shall
be aligned with the Science of Reading, as defined in G.S. 115C-83.3."

PART V. RELOCATE NC PRE-K FROM DHHS TO DPI
SECTION 5.(a) The NC Prekindergarten (NC Pre-K) program is transferred from
the Department of Health and Human Services to the Department of Public Instruction effective
July 1, 2025. This transfer shall have all of the elements of a Type I transfer, as defined in
G.S. 143A-6(a). All duties and requirements associated with NC Pre-K are now the duty and
responsibility of the Department of Public Instruction to fulfill.
SECTION 5.(b) G.S. 143B-168.10A reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-168.10A. NC Pre-K Reports.
The Division of Child Development and Early Education Department of Public Instruction
shall submit an annual report no later than March 15 of each year to the Joint Legislative
Commission on Governmental Operations, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health
and Human Services, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the
House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, the
Office of State Budget and Management, the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee,
and the Fiscal Research Division. The report shall include the following:
(1) The number of children participating in the NC Pre-K program.
(2) The number of children participating in the NC Pre-K program who have
never been served in other early education programs, such as child care, public
or private preschool, Head Start, Early Head Start, or early intervention
programs.
(3) The expected NC Pre-K expenditures for the programs and the source of the
local contributions.
(4) The results of an annual evaluation of the NC Pre-K program."
SECTION 5.(c) G.S. 143B-168.10F(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) The Division of Childhood Development and Early Education of the Department of
Health and Human Services Department of Public Instruction shall post the following
information on its website:
(1) The educational opportunities for kindergarten offered by local school
administrative units.
(2) The educational opportunities for kindergarten offered by charter schools.
(3) Scholarships for enrollment in nonpublic schools provided pursuant to Part
2A of Article 39 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes, or any successor
program.
House Bill 947-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
This information shall be indexed or searchable by county, and the
Division Department shall update the information on June 1 each year."
SECTION 5.(d) NC Pre-K Program. – The Department of Public Instruction shall
comply with the following provisions:
(1) Eligibility. – The Department of Public Instruction shall continue
implementing the NC Prekindergarten (NC Pre-K) program. The NC Pre-K
program shall serve children who are 4 years of age on or before August 31
of the program year. In determining eligibility, the Department shall establish
income eligibility requirements for the program not to exceed seventy-five
percent (75%) of the State median income. Up to twenty percent (20%) of
children enrolled may have family incomes in excess of seventy-five percent
(75%) of median income if those children have other designated risk factors.
Furthermore, any age-eligible child who is a child of either of the following
shall be eligible for the program: (i) an active duty member of the Armed
Forces of the United States, including the North Carolina National Guard,
State military forces, or a reserve component of the Armed Forces who was
ordered to active duty by the proper authority within the last 18 months or is
expected to be ordered within the next 18 months, or (ii) a member of the
Armed Forces of the United States, including the North Carolina National
Guard, State military forces, or a reserve component of the Armed Forces who
was injured or killed while serving on active duty. Eligibility determinations
for NC Pre-K participants may continue through local education agencies and
local North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., partnerships. Other than
developmental disabilities or other chronic health issues, the Department shall
not consider the health of a child as a factor in determining eligibility for
participation in the NC Pre-K program.
(2) Staff-to-child ratio and class size. – The classroom shall not exceed a
maximum staff-to-child ratio of one to 10 with a maximum class size of 20
children, with at least one teacher and one teacher assistant per classroom. A
classroom of 10 children or less shall have at least one teacher. The Child Care
Commission shall adopt any rules, and the Department of Public Instruction
shall revise any rules or policies necessary to implement the provisions of this
subdivision.
(3) Multiyear contracts. – The Department of Public Instruction shall require the
NC Pre-K contractor to issue multiyear contracts for licensed private child
care centers providing NC Pre-K classrooms.
(4) Building standards. – Notwithstanding G.S. 110-91(4), private child care
facilities and public schools operating NC Pre-K classrooms shall meet the
building standards for preschool students as provided in G.S. 115C-521.1.
(5) Programmatic standards. – Except as provided in subdivision (3) of this
subsection, entities operating NC Pre-K classrooms shall adhere to all of the
policies prescribed by the Department of Public Instruction regarding
programmatic standards and classroom requirements.
(6) NC Pre-K committees. – Local NC Pre-K committees shall use the standard
decision-making process developed by the Department of Public Instruction
in awarding NC Pre-K classroom slots and student selection.
(7) Reporting. – The Department of Public Instruction shall submit an annual
report no later than March 15 of each year to the Joint Legislative Education
Oversight Committee, the Office of State Budget and Management, and the
Fiscal Research Division. The report shall include the following:
Page 6 House Bill 947-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a. The number of children participating in the NC Pre-K program by
county.
b. The number of children participating in the NC Pre-K program who
have never been served in other early education programs such as child
care, public or private preschool, Head Start, Early Head Start, or early
intervention programs.
c. The expected NC Pre-K expenditures for the programs and the source
of the local contributions.
d. The results of an annual evaluation of the NC Pre-K program.
(8) Audits. – The administration of the NC Pre-K program by local partnerships
shall be subject to the financial and compliance audits authorized under
G.S. 143B-168.14(b).

PART VI. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 6. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
House Bill 947-First Edition Page 7